bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Напитки > Чай и запарки: Съставки и комплекти за чай с мехурчета; Запарки; Готови за пиене билкови отвари и чайове; Чай
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Alkollü ve Alkolsüz İçecekler > Çaylar ve Demleme İçecekler: Bubble tea malzemeleri ve kitleri; İnfüzyonlar; İçmeye Hazır Bitki Çayları ve Çaylar; Çay
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Băuturi > Ceai și infuzii: Ingrediente și kituri pentru bubble tea; Infuzii; Infuzii și ceaiuri din plante gata de consumat; Ceai
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Chás e infusões: Ingredientes e kits para bubble tea; Infusões; Infusões e chás de ervas prontos para beber; Chá
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Bebidas > Chá e infusões: Ingredientes e kits de bubble tea; Infusões; Infusões e chás de ervas prontos a beber; Chá
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Napoje > Herbaty i napary: Składniki i zestawy do bubble tea; Napary; Napary ziołowe i herbaty gotowe do spożycia; Herbata
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Nápoje > Čaje a bylinné směsi: Přísady a sady na bubble tea; Nálevy; Hotové bylinné nálevy a čaje; Čaj
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Pića > Čaj i infuzije: Sastojci i kompleti za bubble tea; Infuzije; Biljni napitci i čajevi spremni za piće; Čaj
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 饮料/饮品 > 茶饮品: 珍珠奶茶原料与套装; 茶饮品; 即饮草本浸液与草本茶; 茶
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Boissons > Thé et infusions: Ingrédients et kits pour bubble tea; Infusions; Infusions et thés prêts à boire; Thé
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Drikkevarer > Te og blandinger: Ingredienser og sæt til bubble tea; Blandinger; Urteblandinger og -te, der kan drikkes med det samme; Te
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Drikkevarer > Te og infusjoner: Boblete-ingredienser og -sett; Infusjoner; Drikkeklare urtete og vanlig te; Te
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 飲料 > 茶類飲品: 珍珠奶茶原料與組合包; 調味茶; 即飲草本茶; 茶
ja: 食品・飲料 > 飲料 > お茶・紅茶: タピオカティー材料・キット; 煎茶; すぐ飲めるハーブティー・お茶; 紅茶
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Drycker > Te och infusioner: Ingredienser och kit för bubble tea; Infusioner; Drickfärdiga örtteer; Thé
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Italok > Tea és infúziók: Bubble tea hozzávalók és szettek; Infúziók; Fogyasztásra kész gyógyteák és teák; Tea
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Bebidas > Té e infusiones: Ingredientes y kits para té de burbujas; Infusiones; Infusiones y tés de hierbas listos para beber; Té
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Pijače > Čaj in poparki: Sestavine in kompleti za čaj s kroglicami; Poparki; Zeliščni napitki in čaji, pripravljeni za pitje; Čaj
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Ποτά > Τσάι & αφεψήματα: Υλικά και κιτ bubble tea; Αφεψήματα; Έτοιμα προς κατανάλωση φυτικά αφεψήματα & τσάι; Τσάι
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Напитки > Чай и травяные настои: Ингредиенты и наборы для бабл-ти; Травяные настои; Готовые к употреблению травяные настои и чай; Чай
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Đồ uống > Trà và đồ uống từ trà: Nguyên liệu và bộ pha trà sữa trân châu; Đồ uống từ trà; Trà và nước thảo mộc pha sẵn; Trà
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 음료 > 차: 버블티 재료 및 키트; 인퓨전; 바로 마실 수 있는 허브차 & 차; 차
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Bevande > Tè e infusi: Ingredienti e kit per bubble tea; Infusi; Infusi e tè alle erbe pronti da bere; Tea
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Nápoje > Čaje a odvary: Ingrediencie a sady na bubble tea; Odvary; Bylinkové nálevy a čaje pripravené na pitie; Čaje
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Gėrimai > Arbata ir užpilai: Burbulinės arbatos ingredientai ir rinkiniai; Užpilai; Paruošti gerti žolelių užpilai ir arbatos; Arbata
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Beverages > Tea & Infusions: Bubble Tea Ingredients & Kits; Infusions; Ready-To-Drink Herbal Infusions & Tea; Tea
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Getränke > Tees & Aufgüsse: Bubble-Tea-Zutaten & -Sets; Aufgüsse; Trinkfertige Kräutertees & Tees; Tee
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Juomat > Tee- ja haudutettavat juomat: Kuplateen ainesosat ja tarvikkeet; Infuusiot; Yrttihauduke- ja teejuomat; Tee
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > เครื่องดื่ม > ชาและชาสมุนไพร: ส่วนผสมและชุดเครื่องมือทำชานมไข่มุก; ชาสมุนไพร; ชาสมุนไพรพร้อมดื่ม; ชา
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Drinken > Thee en aftreksels: Bubble tea-ingrediënten en -pakketten; Aftreksels; Kant-en-klare kruidenthee en thee; Thee